test/src/morphology/N-mieli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - mieli: # adjectives 'big / mieli' - full paradigm
     mieli+N+Sg+Nom: mieli
     mieli+N+Sg+Gen: mielen
     mieli+N+Sg+Acc: [mieli, mielen]
     mieli+N+Sg+Par: mieldy
     mieli+N+Sg+Tra: mielekse
     mieli+N+Sg+Abe: [mielettä, mieletä, mielettäh]
     mieli+N+Sg+Com: mielenke
     mieli+N+Sg+Ine: mieles
     mieli+N+Sg+Ela: [mielespäi, mieles]
     mieli+N+Sg+Ill: mieleh
     mieli+N+Sg+Ade: mielel
     mieli+N+Sg+Abl: [mielelpäi, mielel]
     mieli+N+Sg+All: mielele
     mieli+N+Sg+Ess: mielenny
     mieli+N+Sg+Ter: mielessah
     mieli+N+Sg+Apr: mielellyö
     mieli+N+Pl+Nom: mielet
     mieli+N+Pl+Gen: [mielien, mielilöin]
     mieli+N+Pl+Acc: mielet
     mieli+N+Pl+Par: [mielii, mielilöi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Tra: [mielikse, mielilöikse]
     mieli+N+Pl+Abe: [mielittä, mielitä, mielittäh, mielilöittä, mielilöitä, mielilöittäh]
     mieli+N+Pl+Com: [mielienke, mielilöinke]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ine: [mielis, mielilöis]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ela: [mielispäi, mielis, mielilöispäi, mielilöis]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ill: [mielihe, mielilöihe]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ade: [mielil, mielilöil]
     mieli+N+Pl+Abl: [mielilpäi, mielil, mielilöilpäi, mielilöil]
     mieli+N+Pl+All: [mielile, mielilöile]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ess: [mielinny, mielilöinny]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ins: [mielin, mielilöin]
     mieli+N+Pl+Apr: [mielillyö, mielilöillyö]
     mieli+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: mieligi
     mieli+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: mielengi
     mieli+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [mieligi, mielengi]
     mieli+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: mieldygi
     mieli+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: mieleksegi
     mieli+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [mielettägi, mieletägi, mielettähgi]
     mieli+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: mielenkegi
     mieli+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: mielesgi
     mieli+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [mielespäigi, mielesgi]
     mieli+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: mielehgi
     mieli+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: mielelgi
     mieli+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [mielelpäigi, mielelgi]
     mieli+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: mielelegi
     mieli+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: mielennygi
     mieli+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: mielessahgi
     mieli+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: mielellyögi
     mieli+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: mieletgi
     mieli+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: [mieliengi, mielilöingi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: mieletgi
     mieli+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: [mieliigi, mielilöigi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: [mieliksegi, mielilöiksegi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [mielittägi, mielitägi, mielittähgi, mielilöittägi, mielilöitägi, mielilöittähgi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: [mielienkegi, mielilöinkegi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: [mielisgi, mielilöisgi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [mielispäigi, mielisgi, mielilöispäigi, mielilöisgi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: [mielihegi, mielilöihegi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: [mielilgi, mielilöilgi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [[mielilpäigi, mielilgi, mielilöilpäigi, mielilöilgi]
     mieli+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: [mielilegi, mielilöilegi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: [mielinnygi, mielilöinnygi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: [mielingi, mielilöingi]
     mieli+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: [mielillyögi, mielilöillyögi]
